Tennessee, session 114, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-3-201(8)(B), is amended by
deleting subdivision (8)(B) and substituting:
(8)
(B) "Goods" also means all improvements to real property, including, but
not limited to, buildings, structures, equipment, fixtures, and anything else
permanently attached to real property, but does not include real property;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-3-1201(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) To the extent permitted by federal law or regulations, local governments may
make purchases of:
(1) Goods, except motor vehicles other than those manufactured for a
special purpose as defined in § 12-3-1208, or services included in federal
general service administration contracts or other applicable federal open
purchase contracts either directly or through the appropriate state agency;
provided, that no purchase under this section shall be made at a price higher
than that which is contained in the contract between the general services
administration and the vendor affected; and
(2) Goods and services directly, without bid or quotations, from vendors
awarded general services administration (GSA) schedule contracts at prices
HB1173
002696
- 1 -

equal to the vendor's current GSA schedule price. The terms and conditions
agreeable to a local government may be used in lieu of the GSA terms and
conditions in such purchases.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002696